Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.220

Political subdivisions—Fees.

The office may charge to a political subdivision in this state a reasonable fee or other appropriate charge, to be set by rule adopted by the office under chapter 34.05 RCW, prorated on the relative benefit to the political subdivision, for the certification under this chapter of a business.

[ 1993 c 195 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date of 1993 c 195—1993 sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 39.19.200.